Idaho, session 2025, H0042.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-5905, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-5905. IDAHO SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY ADVISORY BOARD. (1) There is
hereby established in the office of the state board of education the Idaho
school safety and security advisory board. The advisory board shall consist
of thirteen (13) six (6) members as follows:
(a) Four (4) Two (2) members appointed by the governor as follows:
(i) One (1) parent of a student who attends an Idaho public
school; person currently employed as an emergency responder; and
(ii) One (1) teacher who teaches in an Idaho public school member
at large;
(iii) One (1) representative of a local school board; and
(iv) One (1) representative of school superintendents;
(b) The state superintendent of public instruction or the superinten-
dent's designee;
(c) One (1) representative from appointed by the state board of educa-
tion; and
(d) One (1) representative from the Idaho state police;
(e) One (1) representative from the Idaho chiefs of police association;
(f) One (1) representative from the Idaho sheriffs' association;
(g) One (1) representative from the Idaho office of emergency manage-
ment;
(h) One (1) representative from the Idaho fire chiefs association; and
(i) (d) Two (2) representatives from the state legislature that shall
include one (1) member from the senate appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate and one (1) member from the house of representa-
tives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(2) The members of the advisory board shall serve the following terms:
(a) The gubernatorial appointees shall serve terms of three (3) years.
(b) (2) All other members shall serve terms of two (2) years and, if ap-
pointed, shall remain in service after the end of a term at the pleasure of
the respective appointing body provided in subsection (1) of this section
until such member is reappointed or a new member is appointed.
(3) A vacancy on the advisory board shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment and for the balance of the unexpired term.
(4) The advisory board shall appoint a chairperson from among its mem-
bers for a term certain.


(5) The members of the advisory board shall be compensated as provided
in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code.
(6) The advisory board shall meet at least annually, but may meet more
frequently subject to the call of the chairperson.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.